Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2063.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; corrections oversight fund; use of monies A. The sum of $1,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the corrections oversight fund established by section 41-7007, Arizona Revised Statutes. B. The director of the independent correctional oversight office may use the monies appropriated in subsection A of this section for the purposes of title 41, chapter 59, Arizona Revised Statutes.